Tennessee, session 114, SB1592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 56, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section applies to all municipalities that have established an LEA, as
defined in § 49-1-103, pursuant to § 49-2-401.
(b) If the municipal legislative body and the governing body of the LEA fail to
agree upon a budget for the LEA by August 31 of any year, then, by operation of law, the
budget for the LEA is equal to the minimum budget required to comply with the local
match and maintenance of effort provisions of the TISA, as defined in § 49-3-104.
However, if for three (3) consecutive fiscal years the municipal legislative body and the
governing body of the LEA fail to agree upon a budget and the LEA receives the
minimum required funding for that fiscal year in accordance with this subsection (b), then
the budget for the LEA for the third fiscal year must include a mandatory increase that is
equivalent to three percent (3%) of the required funding from local sources for schools;
provided, however, that this increase is not required if during any of the three (3)
consecutive fiscal years the governing body of the LEA failed to submit its budget
proposal to the municipal legislative body by May 1.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 6, Chapter 56, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
SB1592
010714
- 1 -

(a) If a municipal legislative body has not adopted a budget by the first day of
any fiscal year, and until a final operating budget is adopted, the operating budget for the
fiscal year just ended and the appropriation ordinance for the fiscal year just ended
continues in effect by operation of law without further action of the municipal legislative
body, except as required in subsection (b); provided, however, that all agencies of the
municipality and other entities receiving appropriated funds shall not, during any month,
encumber funds in excess of the allotment for a comparable month of the preceding
fiscal year, unless specifically authorized to do so by ordinance of the municipal
legislative body. The authorizing ordinance must identify a corresponding funding
source equal to the amount of any excess allotment authorized. Any excess allotment
authorized becomes part of the final operating budget. During the time that the
continuing operating budget is in effect, the budget may be amended in accordance with
the procedures for amending a final operating budget, and amendments may be made
as necessary to provide for debt obligations and court-ordered expenditures.
(b) The continuing operating budget authorized by this section may continue in
effect for the first two (2) months of the fiscal year and, upon approval from the
comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee after a showing of extraordinary
circumstances, may continue for the third month of the fiscal year; provided, however,
that a continuing operating budget must not extend beyond the last day of the third
month of the fiscal year. The municipality shall submit its justification for extending the
continuing operating budget through the third month of the fiscal year to the comptroller
of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval by the fifteenth day of the
second month of the fiscal year. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's
designee may request additional information deemed necessary to properly review the
continuing operating budget extension request. The comptroller of the treasury or the
- 2 - 010714

comptroller's designee shall report the comptroller's approval or disapproval to the
municipal legislative body within seven (7) business days from the date on which the
request was received or the date on which any requested supplemental documentation
was received, whichever is later, at which time the municipal legislative body may take
action to extend the continuing operating budget for the third month of the fiscal year.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-56-210, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010714